Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Kelsey Smith Act:

(1) Call location information means the best available location information, including, but not limited to, information obtained using historical cellular site information or a mobile locator tool;

(2) Law enforcement agency means a police department, a town marshal, the office of sheriff, and the Nebraska State Patrol;

(3) Wireless carrier has the same meaning as in section 86-1058; and

(4) Wireless communication device means any wireless electronic communication device that provides for voice or data communication between two or more parties, including a mobile or cellular telephone.

Laws 2010, LB735, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 11.